Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 31 Department of Public Advocacy

31.010.
Department of Public Advocacy — Establishment — Functions — Independent agency.

There is hereby established as an independent agency of state government, attached for administrative purposes to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Department of Public Advocacy, in order to provide for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a state-sponsored and controlled system for:

The representation of indigent persons accused of crimes or mental states which may result in their incarceration or confinement; and

The pursuit of legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to ensure the protection of the rights of persons with disabilities, independent of any agency that provides treatment, services, or rehabilitation to persons with disabilities. For the purposes of this chapter, “persons with disabilities” shall refer to those persons eligible for protection and advocacy services under Public Laws 99-319, 102-569, 103-218, 106-170, and 106-402 as amended and any other federal enabling statute hereafter enacted that defines the eligible client base for protection and advocacy services.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 1; 1976, ch. 177, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 19, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 283, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 115, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 151, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 167, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

31.015.
Public Advocacy Commission — Appointment — Members — Terms — Compensation — Duties.

The Public Advocacy Commission shall consist of the following members, none of whom shall be a prosecutor, law enforcement official, or judge, who shall serve terms of four (4) years, except the initial terms shall be established as hereafter provided:

Two (2) members appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor. This member shall be a child advocate or a person with substantial experience in the representation of children;

Two (2) members appointed by the Kentucky Supreme Court;

Three (3) members, who are licensed to practice law in Kentucky and have substantial experience in the representation of persons accused of crime, appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted to him or her for each individual vacancy by the board of governors of the Kentucky Bar Association;

The dean, ex officio, of each of the law schools in Kentucky or his or her designee; and

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted to him or her by the joint advisory boards of the Protection and Advocacy Division of the Department of Public Advocacy.

Any member of the commission serving prior to July 15, 2002, shall serve until the expiration of his or her current term of office. Subsequent appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for which his or her predecessor was appointed.

At the first meeting of the commission, a drawing by lot shall be conducted to determine the length of each original member’s term. Initially there shall be four (4) two (2) year terms, four (4) three (3) year terms, and four (4) four (4) year terms. Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments. Appointments to fill vacancies occurring before the expiration of a term shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The commission shall first meet at the call of the Governor and thereafter as the commission shall determine on a regular basis, but at least quarterly, and shall be presided over by a chairperson elected by its members for a one (1) year term. A majority of commission members shall constitute a quorum, and decisions shall require the majority vote of those present; except that a recommendation to the Governor pertaining to the appointment, renewal of the appointment, or removal of the public advocate shall require a majority vote of the commission. Each member of the commission shall have one (1) vote, and voting by proxy shall be prohibited.

The public advocate shall, upon appointment or renewal, be an ex officio member of the commission without the power to vote, shall serve as secretary of the commission, and shall be entitled to attend and participate in all meetings of the commission except discussions relating to renewal of his or her term or his or her removal.

Commission members shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in carrying out the duties of the commission and shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each meeting attended unless prohibited by law from receiving such compensation.

The commission shall:

Receive applications, interview, and recommend to the Governor three (3) attorneys as nominees for appointment as the public advocate;

Assist the public advocate in drawing up procedures for the selection of his or her staff;

Review the performance of the public advocacy system and provide general supervision of the public advocate;

Assist the Department of Public Advocacy in ensuring its independence through public education regarding the purposes of the public advocacy system; and

Review and adopt an annual budget prepared by the public advocate for the system and provide support for budgetary requests to the General Assembly.

In no event shall the commission or its members interfere with the discretion, judgment, or advocacy of employees of the Department of Public Advocacy in their handling of individual cases.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 486, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 116, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 167, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

31.020.
Public advocate — Qualifications — Selection — Term — Salary — Staff.

The Department of Public Advocacy shall consist of the public advocate, deputy public advocate, general counsel, such assistant public advocates as the public advocate shall deem necessary, and such secretarial and other personnel as the public advocate shall deem necessary.

The public advocate shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) attorneys submitted to him or her by the Public Advocacy Commission; shall be an attorney licensed to practice law in Kentucky with at least five (5) years experience in the practice of law; shall be excepted from the classified service; shall be the chief administrator of the Department of Public Advocacy and an appointing authority as that term is defined in KRS

18A.005

; and shall serve a term of four (4) years, which is renewable, unless removed by the Governor. The incumbent public advocate shall serve until a successor is nominated by the commission and approved by the Governor. The compensation of the public advocate shall be set by the provisions of KRS

64.640

.

The deputy public advocate shall be an attorney and shall be appointed by the public advocate and shall serve at his or her pleasure.

The general counsel shall be an attorney and shall be appointed by the public advocate and shall serve at his or her pleasure. The general counsel shall represent the interests of the department as directed by the public advocate.

The assistant public advocates shall be attorneys, shall be appointed by the public advocate, shall be covered by the merit system, and shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

12.210

.

Secretarial, clerical, and other personnel shall be appointed by the public advocate and shall be covered by the merit system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 4; 1974, ch. 358, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 20, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 377, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2012, ch. 151, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

31.025.
Liability insurance for full-time public advocates. [Repealed.]

31.030.
Authority and duties of department.

The authority and duties of the Department of Public Advocacy shall include but are not limited to:

Administering the statewide public advocacy system created by this chapter or by any other appropriate legislation or court decision;

Providing technical aid to local counsel representing indigent persons;

Assisting local counsel on appeals or taking appeals for local counsel, in the same manner as such appeals for the Commonwealth are presently handled by the Attorney General;

Developing and promulgating standards and administrative regulations, rules, and procedures for administration of the defense of indigent defendants in criminal cases that the public advocate, statutes, or the courts determine are subject to public assistance;

Determining necessary personnel for the department and appointing staff attorneys, who shall be “assistant public advocates,” and non-lawyer assistants within the merit system, subject to available funding and employee allotments;

Maintaining and exercising control over the department’s information technology system, and working with the Commonwealth Office of Technology to ensure that the department’s information technology is in conformity with the requirements of state government;

Reviewing and approving local plans for providing counsel for indigent persons;

Conducting research into, and developing and implementing methods of, improving the operation of the criminal justice system with regard to indigent defendants and other defendants in criminal actions, including participation in groups, organizations, and projects dedicated to improving representation of defendants in criminal actions in particular, or the interests of indigent or impoverished persons in general;

Issuing rules, promulgating administrative regulations, and establishing standards as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, the decisions of the United States Supreme Court, the decisions of the Kentucky Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, and other applicable court decisions or statutes;

Being authorized to pursue legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to ensure the protection of the rights of persons with disabilities;

Being authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of all full-time public advocates, deputy public advocates, and assistant public advocates to protect them from liability for malpractice arising in the course or scope of employment and for the protection of attorneys with whom the Department of Public Advocacy contracts to protect them from liability for malpractice arising in the course or scope of the contract;

Being authorized to seek and apply for and solicit funds for the operation of the defense of indigent persons or protection of the persons with disabilities programs from any source, public or private, and to receive donations, grants, awards, and similar funds from any legal source. Those funds shall be placed in a special account for the Department of Public Advocacy and those funds shall not lapse;

Being authorized to assign an attorney, including a conflict attorney under a plan, for good cause, at any stage of representation, including trial, appeal, or other post-conviction or post-disposition proceeding, including discharge revocation hearings, preliminary parole revocation hearings, and conditional discharge revocation hearings, regardless of whether the hearings are conducted by constitutional judges or executive branch administrative law judges;

Filing with the Legislative Research Commission an annual report, by September 30 of each year, setting forth the total number of cases assigned to the department, the average number of cases per department attorney, all funding available to the department, the average amount of state funds expended per assigned case, and any other information requested by the Legislative Research Commission or that the public advocate finds necessary to inform the General Assembly, the judicial or executive branches, or the public of the activities conducted by the department during the previous fiscal year; and

Do other activities and institute other programs as necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, or those decisions or statutes which are the subject of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 8; 1978, ch. 155, § 21, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 283, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2012, ch. 151, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 87, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

31.035.
Advisory boards for protection and advocacy division — Appointment — Number — Terms — Compensation.

There shall be advisory boards for the Protection and Advocacy Division of the Department of Public Advocacy as set forth in Public Laws 99-319 and 106-402 and their implementing regulations. Each shall be comprised of not more than seventeen (17) citizen members appointed for terms of not less than two (2) years by the Protection and Advocacy Division director.

The advisory boards shall meet at least quarterly and on other occasions as may be necessary upon the call of the Protection and Advocacy Division director.

The members of the advisory boards shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for all expenses incurred through the performance of their duties as members of their respective advisory board. No member of any board shall be held to be a public officer by reason of his or her membership on the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 2002, ch. 283, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Gillig, Kentucky Post-Conviction Remedies and the Judicial Development of Kentucky Rule of Criminal Procedure 11.42, 83 Ky. L.J. 265 (1994-95).

31.040.
District public defender — Creation and number. [Repealed.]

31.050.
Public advocacy plans — Review and approval or denial by public advocate — Funding by department and governmental unit — Recordkeeping — Annual report.

The public advocate shall review and approve or deny or suggest modifications to all plans which are submitted to the Department of Public Advocacy for defense of indigent persons.

If the plan for defense of indigent persons is approved, the public advocate may allot a sufficient sum, subject to the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to the county or counties in the judicial circuit involved for the purpose of assisting the said plan.

At the end of each funding period, any moneys not expended shall revert to the state Department of Public Advocacy.

Counties, urban-counties, charter counties, consolidated local governments, and other units submitting applications under this chapter shall be obligated to pay and shall pay all costs incurred in their own defense of indigent programs which are in excess of the maximum amount allotted or other maximum amount of grant as specified in this chapter.

The fiscal court; legislative body of the urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government; or nonprofit corporation is authorized to seek and apply for and solicit funds for the operation of the defense of the indigent from any source, public or private, and to receive donations, grants, awards, and similar funds from any legal source.

A defending attorney shall keep appropriate records respecting each needy person whom he or she represents under this chapter.

The public advocate, nonprofit organization, or person administering a public advocacy plan shall submit an annual report to the Department of Public Advocacy showing the number of persons represented under this chapter, the crimes involved, the outcome of each case, and the expenditures, totalled by kind, made in carrying out the responsibilities imposed by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 5; 1974, ch. 358, § 2; 1976, ch. 177, § 2; 1978, ch. 155, § 22, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 283, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

31.051.
Moneys from indigent defendants credited to fund of county where trial held — Use — Administrative fee assessed on persons for whom counsel is provided. [Repealed.]

31.060.
Local office in jurisdiction with ten or more Circuit Judges required — Funding by governmental unit required in amount set by department.

Each county, urban-county, charter county, and consolidated local government with a judicial circuit containing ten (10) or more Circuit Judges, excluding judges of family court divisions as designated by the Supreme Court, shall establish and maintain an office of public advocacy and submit a plan for the operation thereof to the Department of Public Advocacy. If the plan submitted is approved by the Department of Public Advocacy, the public advocate shall grant to the county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government the amount to which it would be entitled under KRS 31.050(2) which shall be used as the Commonwealth’s share in defraying the expenses of the program in that county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government.

A county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government identified in subsection (1) of this section shall contribute to the funding of the plan selected and approved in such amounts as the Department of Public Advocacy shall deem reasonable and necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 6; 1974, ch. 358, § 3; 1978, ch. 155, § 23, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 283, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2012, ch. 151, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section and KRS

31.050

, and in view of KRS

41.110

,

45.230

(repealed, now see KRS

45.229

) Const., § 230, excess funds returned to the public defender (now public advocate) at the end of the fiscal year may not be returned to a county as an addition to the maximum formula state grant provided.

OAG 73-525

.

The term “funding period” is to be construed in its ordinary statutory sense as applied to the state and counties as a fiscal year commencing July 1 and ending June 30.

OAG 73-753

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Abramson, Kentucky’s Future Need for Attorneys, 63 Ky. L.J. 323 (1974-1975).

Gillig, Kentucky Post-Conviction Remedies and the Judicial Development of Kentucky Rule of Criminal Procedure 11.42, 83 Ky. L.J. 265 (1994-95).

Notes, McGrath, Sommers v. Commonwealth: An Indigent Criminal Defendant’s Right to Publicly Funded Expert Assistance Other than the Assistance of Counsel, 84 Ky. L.J. 387 (1995-96).

31.065.
Local office in county with less than ten Circuit Judges discretionary — Methods of delivering services — Requirements if county elects — Department’s responsibility if county does not elect.

The fiscal court of each county or legislative body of an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government, except a county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government wherein the judicial district is required to maintain a public advocate under this chapter, may provide for the representation of needy persons by:

Contracting with one (1) or more attorneys, professional service corporations, nonprofit organizations, or an association of attorneys to provide the legal services required in this chapter, provided there are suitable attorneys available willing to provide these services for reasonable compensation;

Establishing and maintaining an office of public advocacy; or

Adopting any combination of the options provided for in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph.

The fiscal court of a county or the legislative body of an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government may join with one (1) or more other counties, urban-counties, charter counties, or consolidated local governments in its judicial district or elsewhere or with any cities located within the county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government or counties, urban-counties, charter counties, or consolidated local governments in providing this representation. These agreements shall be made pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 65.

If it elects to establish and maintain an office of public advocacy, and if the appropriate legislative authorities and fiscal courts concerned respectively agree on qualifications, term of office, compensation, support, and appointment under KRS 31.071(1), the fiscal court of a county or the legislative body of an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government may join with cities within the county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government and with the legislative body of one (1) or more other counties, urban-counties, charter counties, or consolidated local governments to establish and maintain a joint office of public advocacy. In that case, the participating counties, urban-counties, charter counties, or consolidated local governments shall be treated for the purposes of this chapter as if they were one (1) county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government. The agreements shall be made pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 65.

If a county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government chooses not to submit a plan under subsection (1) of this section, or if a plan submitted to the public advocate is denied as provided by KRS

31.050

, then the public advocate may establish for a county containing less than ten (10) Circuit Judges or a group of counties a local public advocacy system by:

Contracting with one (1) or more attorneys, professional service corporations, nonprofit organizations, or an association of attorneys to provide the legal services required in this chapter; provided there are suitable attorneys available who are willing to provide those services for reasonable compensation; or

Providing an office of public advocacy, which shall be staffed by an assistant public advocate who directs the office and who shall be an attorney, and any number of assistant public advocates and other personnel necessary to perform adequately the functions of said office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 358, § 8; 1978, ch. 155, § 4; 1982, ch. 377, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2002, ch. 283, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Gillig, Kentucky Post-Conviction Remedies and the Judicial Development of Kentucky Rule of Criminal Procedure 11.42, 83 Ky. L.J. 265 (1994-95).

31.070.
Fees — Appointed counsel. [Repealed and reenacted.]

31.071.
Requirement if county elects local office — Failure to provide attorney — Responsibility for payment.

If the fiscal court of a county or legislative body of an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government elects to establish and maintain an office for public advocacy, it shall:

Appoint the public advocate and any number of assistant public advocates necessary to adequately perform the functions of said office.

Prescribe the qualifications of the public advocate, his term of office which may not be more than four (4) years and fix the rate of annual compensation for him and his assistants. In order to be qualified for appointment as public advocate, a person must have been admitted to the practice of law and licensed to practice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and be competent to counsel and defend a person charged with a crime.

Provide for the establishment, maintenance, and support of the office.

If the fiscal court of a county or the legislative body of an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government elects to arrange with a nonprofit organization to provide attorneys, the county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government and any cities involved shall provide for the establishment, maintenance, and support of that organization or shall reimburse the organization for such expenses.

If, in a county where the fiscal court or in an urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government where the legislative body has elected to provide representation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, after finding that the fiscal cour, or legislative body fails to provide an attorney to a person eligible for representation under KRS Chapter 31, a court assigns, under the court’s inherent authority, an attorney to represent a needy person, it shall prescribe a reasonable rate of compensation for his services and shall determine the direct expenses necessary to representation for which he would be reimbursed. The county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government shall pay the attorney the amounts so prescribed from the funds made available by the Department of Public Advocacy.

An attorney under subsection (3) of this section shall be compensated for his services with regard to the complexity of the issues, the time involved, and other relevant considerations. However, no fee shall be paid in excess of the prevailing maximum fee per attorney paid by the Department of Public Advocacy for the type of representation provided, and no hourly rate shall be paid in excess of the prevailing hourly rate paid by the Department of Public Advocacy for the type of representation provided.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

31.080.
Public advocate — Solicitation of funds for programs. [Repealed.]

31.085.
Plans must comply with department’s rules and regulations.

All plans authorized by this chapter shall conform to all rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Public Advocacy.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

31.090.
Funding deficiencies. [Repealed.]

31.100.
Definitions.

The following terms and standards shall apply, subject to further definition and regulation by the Department of Public Advocacy:

“Defending attorney” means any attorney who is representing a needy or indigent person;

“Department” means the Department of Public Advocacy;

“Detain” means to have in custody or otherwise deprive of freedom of action;

“Expenses,” when used with reference to representation under this chapter, includes the expenses of investigation, other preparation, and trial, together with the expenses of any appeal;

“Needy person” or “indigent person” means:

A person eighteen (18) years of age or older or an emancipated minor under the age of eighteen (18) who, at the time his or her need is determined, is unable to provide for the payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation;

A minor, under the age of eighteen (18), who is a party defendant in an action of being an habitual runaway from his or her parent or person exercising control or supervision of the child brought under KRS 630.020(1) or of being beyond the control of parents brought under KRS 630.020(2), and at the time his or her need is determined is unable to provide for the payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation;

An unemancipated minor, under the age of eighteen (18), who allegedly has committed an offense as described in KRS 610.010(1), or who allegedly is beyond the control of the school as described in KRS 610.010(2)(a), or who allegedly is an habitual truant from school as described in KRS 610.010(2)(b), or who allegedly is an habitual runaway as described in KRS 610.010(2)(c), whose custodial parent or guardian at the time the need of the minor is determined is unable to provide for the payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation, and who cannot personally so provide; or

An unemancipated minor, under the age of eighteen (18), alleged to have committed an offense as described in KRS 610.010(1) or (2)(a), (b), or (c), whose custodial parent or guardian at the time the need of the minor is determined has interests adverse to the child relevant to the charged offenses and who is able to provide for the payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation, when such representation is not provided or is not consented to by the unemancipated minor;

“Non-lawyer assistants” shall:

Have the same meaning contemplated by SCR 3.130(5.3) “Responsibilities regarding non-lawyer assistants”; and

Be subject to the Rules of Professional Conduct and the Rules of Evidence as they relate to client confidentiality, attorney-client communications, and attorney-client privilege.

All non-lawyer assistants hired by the department who are independently licensed or certified shall practice under the attorney-client privilege, irrespective of other obligations or duties arising with their independent licenses or certifications. Nothing in this subsection shall authorize the disclosure of confidential information to non-lawyer assistants within the department who are not performing duties at the direction of an attorney;

“Plan” means an agreement between the Department of Public Advocacy and attorneys for the representation of indigent persons who are entitled to representation under this chapter and who, by reason of conflict or otherwise, cannot be represented by the department; and

“Serious crime” includes:

A felony;

A misdemeanor or offense any penalty for which includes the possibility of confinement;

Any legal action which could result in the detainment of a defendant; and

An act that, but for the age of the person involved, would otherwise be a serious crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 10; 1974, ch. 358, § 5; 1976, ch. 177, § 5; 1978, ch. 155, § 27, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2002, ch. 283, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 87, § 14, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

31.110.
Persons entitled to department representation and services — Extent of representation and services — Rights of representation for persons subject to proceedings under KRS Chapter 202C.

A needy person who is being detained by a law enforcement officer, on suspicion of having committed, or who is under formal charge of having committed, or is being detained under a conviction of, a serious crime, or who is accused of having committed a public or status offense or who has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or Cabinet for Health and Family Services for having committed a public or status offense as those are defined by KRS 610.010(1), 610.010(2)(a), (b), (c), or 630.020(2) is entitled:

To be represented by an attorney to the same extent as a person having his or her own counsel is so entitled; and

Except as provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section, to be provided with the necessary services and facilities of representation, including investigation and other preparation. The courts in which the defendant is tried shall waive all costs.

A needy person who is entitled to be represented by an attorney under subsection (1) of this section is entitled:

To be counseled and defended at all stages of the matter beginning with the earliest time when a person providing his or her own counsel would be entitled to be represented by an attorney and including revocation of probation or parole;

To be represented in any appeal; and

To be represented in any other post-conviction, or, if a minor under the age of eighteen (18), post-disposition proceeding, including any appeal from a post- conviction or post-disposition action. However, if the department and the court of competent jurisdiction determines that it is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his or her own expense, there shall be no further right to be represented by counsel under the provisions of this chapter. In cases involving a minor under the age of eighteen (18), prior to making a determination on whether or not a post- disposition action is a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his or her own expense, an attorney with the department shall be granted access to the court file of the minor:

Without the requirement of a formal court order in which the attorney has provided a release signed by the minor or the minor’s legal guardian authorizing the use of the records; and

Notwithstanding any other statute prohibiting the disclosure of a juvenile court file.

A needy person’s right to a benefit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is not affected by his or her having provided a similar benefit at his or her own expense, or by he or she having waived it, at an earlier stage.

A person, whether a needy person or not, who is a minor under the age of eighteen (18) and who is in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice and is residing in a residential treatment center or detention center is entitled to be represented on a legal claim related to his or her confinement involving violations of federal or state statutory rights or constitutional rights. Prior to representation, an attorney with the department shall be granted access to the court file of the minor and residential treatment center or detention center records pertaining to the juvenile:

Without entering an appearance as an attorney of record; and

Notwithstanding any other statute prohibiting the disclosure of a juvenile’s record, including KRS

15A.0651

,

610.320

,

610.340

, or

610.345

.

A person, whether a needy person or not, who is subject to a proceeding under KRS Chapter 202C and is unrepresented at any time shall be entitled to the same rights of representation as a needy person under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 11; 2002, ch. 283, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 101, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 87, § 15, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 87, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2021 ch. 175, § 23, effective April 1, 2021.

31.115.
Appeal by public advocacy attorney. [Repealed and reenacted.]